Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
11-10-710. Transfer of experience.

Unless otherwise provided in § 11-10-723, any employing unit that acquires the organization, trade, and all of the places of business and substantially all of the assets of any employer, excepting, in any such case, any assets retained by the employer incident to the liquidation of the employer's obligations, whether or not the acquiring employing unit was an employing unit within the meaning of § 11-10-208 prior to the acquisition, and that continues the organization, trade, or business as indicated by retaining the predecessor employer's three-digit North American Industry Classification System code shall assume the predecessor employer's actual contributions, regular benefit experience, annual payrolls, liability for current or delinquent contributions, interest, penalty, and otherwise as if no change with respect to the separate account, actual experience, and payrolls or the position of the predecessor employer otherwise had occurred and as if the operations of the predecessor employer had at all times been carried on by the successor employing unit.

The separate account of the predecessor employer shall be transferred by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services to the successor employing unit and, as of the date of the acquisition, shall become the separate account or part of the separate account, as the case may be, of the successor employing unit, and the regular benefits thereafter chargeable to the predecessor employer on account of employment prior to the date of the acquisition shall be charged to the separate account of the successor employing unit.

However, unless otherwise provided in § 11-10-723, if any employing unit acquires a segregable and identifiable portion of the business of any employer, whether the acquiring employing unit was an employing unit within the meaning of § 11-10-208 prior to the acquisition, and whether the acquisition is the result of reorganization, purchase, inheritance, receivership, or for any other cause, and if the successor employing unit desires to obtain any benefit of the predecessor employer's experience, the successor employing unit must file with the director a petition, signed by all interested parties, within thirty (30) days after the acquisition setting out the percentage of the predecessor employer's actual contributions, regular benefit experience, annual payrolls, payment of contributions, and otherwise that should be transferred to the successor employing unit's separate account.

If the director finds the facts substantially as represented in the petition and that all contributions due by the successor employing unit have been paid, he or she shall transfer the proportionate share of the predecessor employer's separate account to the successor employing unit.

Effective the date of the acquisition, the account transferred under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall become the separate account or part of the separate account, as the case may be, of the successor employing unit as if no change with respect to the proportionate share of the separate account had occurred.

Following a transfer as described in subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section, the contribution rate of the successor employing unit shall be determined as follows:

If the successor employing unit is an employer as defined in § 11-10-209 at the time of the transfer and has been assigned a contribution rate under this section, the successor employing unit shall continue to pay contributions at the previously assigned contribution rate through the end of the rate year;

If the successor employing unit is not an employer as defined in § 11-10-209 at the time of the transfer and acquires the business of one (1) employer or the businesses of two (2) or more employers with the same contribution rate, the successor employing unit shall pay contributions at the contribution rate assigned to the predecessor employer or employers from the date the transfer occurred through the end of the rate year; and

If the successor employing unit is not an employer as defined in § 11-10-209 at the time of the transfer and simultaneously acquires the businesses of two (2) or more employers with different rates of contributions, the successor employing unit's contribution rate from the date the transfer occurred through the end of the rate year shall be computed on the combined experience of the predecessor employers as of the regular computation date for the rate year in which the transfer occurred.

From and after the end of the rate year in which the transfer occurred, the successor employing unit's rate of contribution for each rate year following the transfer shall be based on the successor employing unit's experience combined with the experience of the predecessor employer or employers as of the regular computation date for the rate year.

However, if at the regular computation date the successor employing unit and the predecessor employer or employers have less than three (3) years of benefit risk as defined in § 11-10-707(d):

The contribution rate shall be the new employer contribution rate as set forth in § 11-10-704(b)(1); and

The three (3) years of benefit risk shall be calculated using the established new employer calculation date of the successor employing unit or the calculation date of the predecessor employer or employers, whichever date is the earliest.

The director shall give notice of the determination he or she makes under subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section to the predecessor employer unless the predecessor employer has consented to the transfer of experience and to the successor employing unit.

The notice shall become conclusive and binding upon each employing unit unless, within twenty (20) days after the mailing date of the notice to the employing unit's last known mailing address, an application for review and redetermination is filed with the director setting forth the employing unit's reasons for seeking a review and redetermination.

(a) The director may deny the application if he or she finds the reasons set forth by the employing unit making application for review and redetermination are insufficient to change his or her determination.

The director may issue a redetermination within one (1) year of the original determination if, through his or her own investigation, he or she finds the original determination to be in error.

The director shall promptly notify the parties to the review and redetermination of his or her decision by mailing the denial of redetermination to their last known addresses.

The denial of an application for review and redetermination is final and conclusive as of the mailing date of the director's notification.

A party to a review and redetermination under subdivision (d)(2) of this section may appeal from the determination or redetermination of the director by filing a petition with the clerk of the circuit court in the county of the party's residence, if the residence is in Arkansas, or the clerk of the Pulaski County Circuit Court, Arkansas, within thirty (30) days of the mailing date of the director's notice of determination or redetermination.

(b)

Otherwise, the application for review and redetermination shall be granted, and the director shall make a redetermination.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1943, No. 256, § 1; 1945, No. 8, § 1; 1947, No. 398, § 7; 1949, No. 155, § 11; 1953, No. 162, § 14; 1955, No. 395, § 26; 1959, No. 32, § 1; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, § 14; 1985, No. 8, § 11; 1985, No. 9, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108; Acts 1991, No. 48, § 9; 1991, No. 100, § 43; 2003, No. 1223, § 12; 2005, No. 902, § 10; 2007, No. 490, § 14; 2013, No. 1128, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 292.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The term “chancery court” in this section was changed to “circuit court” in light of the 2001 enactment of Ark. Const. Amend. 80.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be affected by § 11-10-723.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment inserted “subsection” preceding “(b)” in (c)(1); and substituted “under” for “pursuant to the provisions of” in (c)(1)(A).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(2).

11-10-711. Temporary closing of business because of absence in armed forces.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provisions of this chapter, if the Director of the Division of Workforce Services finds that an employer's business was closed solely because of the entrance of one (1) or more of the owners, officers, partners, or the majority stockholder into the armed forces of the United States or any of its allies, or of the United Nations, or into state active duty with the Arkansas National Guard, the employer's account shall, for experience rating purposes, not be considered as terminated. If the business is resumed by the employer within one (1) year after the discharge or release of the person from active duty in the armed forces or from state active duty with the Arkansas National Guard, the employer's experience shall be deemed to have been continuous through the closed period.

The employer's reserve ratio after returning from military duty shall be the ratio of the employer's reserve, including regular benefits paid to any individual during the period the employer was in the armed forces, to the average of the employer's annual payrolls for the three (3) or five (5) most recent calendar years for which the employer has reported taxable wages, whichever average is the lesser.

However, successorship provisions shall apply to this account only if the business has been resumed by the employer.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1943, No. 135, § 1; 1943, No. 138, §§ 11-13; 1943, No. 256, § 1; 1945, No. 8, § 1; 1947, No. 398, §§ 6, 7; 1949, No. 155, §§ 8-11; 1953, No. 162, § 15; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108; Acts 2019, No. 462, § 10; 2019, No. 910, § 293.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 462, in (a), deleted “after December 31, 1949” following “United Nations”, inserted “or into state active duty with the Arkansas National Guard”, and inserted “or from state active duty with the Arkansas National Guard”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in the first sentence of (a).

11-10-712. Employer ceasing to pay wages.

Whenever an employer has paid no wages for a period of twelve (12) consecutive calendar quarters following the latest calendar quarter that the employer paid wages in employment, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall terminate the employer's experience rating account and shall destroy the records of the account.

In the event an employer subsequently becomes subject to this chapter after the employer's experience rating account has been so terminated, the employer must again meet the requirements of §§ 11-10-703 — 11-10-708.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1959, No. 238, § 1; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, § 14; 1983, No. 482, §§ 25-30; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 294.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-713. Employees of nonprofit organizations and governmental entities — Definitions.

Benefits paid to individuals based on wages paid by any nonprofit organization or government employing unit shall be financed in accordance with this section.

As used in this section and § 11-10-714:

A “government employing unit” is one for which service in employment as defined in § 11-10-210(a)(2) is performed;

A “nonprofit organization” is an organization for which service in employment as defined in § 11-10-210(a)(3) is performed and which is exempt from income tax under section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954; and

“Wages” are not limited by any amount specified in § 11-10-215.

Any nonprofit organization or government employing unit which, pursuant to § 11-10-210(a)(2) or (a)(3), is subject to this chapter shall pay contributions under § 11-10-701 unless it elects, in accordance with this subsection, to pay to the Director of the Division of Workforce Services for the Unemployment Compensation Fund an amount equal to the amount of regular benefits and, to the extent that the fund is not reimbursed for the extended benefits in accordance with section 204 of the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970, the extended benefits paid, based on wages paid by the employer to individuals for weeks of unemployment that begin during the effective period of the election.

Any nonprofit organization or government employing unit that is or becomes subject to this chapter may elect to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions for a period of not less than one (1) calendar year, provided that it files with the director a written notice of its election within the thirty-day period immediately following the date it becomes subject to this chapter.

Any nonprofit organization or any government employing unit that makes an election in accordance with subdivision (c)(2) of this section shall continue to be liable for payments in lieu of contributions until it files with the director a written notice terminating its election not later than thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of the calendar year for which the termination shall first be effective.

Any nonprofit organization or any government employing unit that has been paying contributions under this chapter for a period subsequent to January 1, 1972, may change to a reimbursable basis by filing with the director not later than thirty (30) days prior to the beginning of any calendar year a written notice of election to become liable for payments in lieu of contributions.

The election shall not be terminable by the employer for that and the next calendar year.

The director may, for good cause, extend the period within which a notice of election, or a notice of termination, must be filed.

He or she may permit an election to be retroactive for a period not to begin earlier than the first day of the current calendar year.

The director, in accordance with such rules as he or she may prescribe, shall notify each employer filing an election notice of any determination that he or she may make under this section and of the effective date or the termination date of the election.

The determinations shall be subject to reconsideration, appeal, and review in accordance with § 11-10-308.

Any nonprofit organization or any government employing unit that elects to make payments in lieu of contributions into the fund as provided in this subsection shall not be liable to make payments with respect to the benefits paid to any individual whose base-period wages include wages for previously uncovered services as defined in § 11-10-507(5)(C) to the extent that the fund is reimbursed for benefits pursuant to section 121 of Pub. L. No. 94-566.

At the end of each calendar quarter, the director shall, except as otherwise may be provided in subsection (e) of this section, bill each employer that has elected to make payments in lieu of contributions for an amount equal to the full amount of the regular benefits and, to the extent that the fund is not reimbursed for the extended benefits in accordance with section 204 of the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970 the extended benefits paid to individuals during the calendar quarter that are based on wages paid by the employer.

The amount due specified in any bill from the director shall be conclusive and binding on the employer unless, not later than thirty (30) days after the bill was mailed to the employer's last known address or was otherwise delivered, the employer files an application for redetermination by the director.

The director shall promptly review and reconsider the amount due specified in the bill and shall issue a redetermination in any case in which the application for redetermination has been filed.

Any redetermination shall be conclusive and binding unless, not later than thirty (30) days after the redetermination was mailed to the employer's last known address or was otherwise delivered, the employer appeals the redetermination of the director by filing a petition with the clerk of the circuit court in the county of the employer's residence, if the residence is in Arkansas, or the clerk of the Pulaski County Circuit Court, Arkansas.

Payment of any bill rendered under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be made not later than thirty (30) days after the bill was mailed to the last known address of the employer or was otherwise delivered to the employer unless there has been an application for review and redetermination in accordance with subdivision (d)(2) of this section.

Payments made by any employer under this section shall not be deducted or deductible, in whole or in part, from the remuneration of individuals in the employ of the employer.

Past due payments of amounts in lieu of contributions shall be subject to the same interest and penalties that, pursuant to §§ 11-10-716 — 11-10-722, apply to past due contributions.

Also, unpaid amounts in lieu of contributions are subject to the same assessment and civil action and other collection provisions of this chapter as apply to unpaid contributions.

Furthermore, the provisions of this chapter which provide for the adjustment or refund of contributions shall apply to the adjustment or refund of payments in lieu of contributions.

Any goods, chattels, moneys, or credits belonging to a private nonprofit employer or political subdivision of this state or any instrumentality of one (1) or more states or political subdivisions and that are in the hands or possession of the State of Arkansas shall be subject to levy or garnishment as provided by law for the satisfaction of any past due payments in lieu of contributions of the employer. (6) Relief from billing shall not be granted if:

Payments in lieu of contributions shall be made in accordance with the following provisions:

Each state government employing unit for which services as defined in § 11-10-210(a)(2)(A) are performed and that is liable for payments in lieu of contributions shall, at the end of each calendar quarter, pay to the director an amount equal to the full amount of regular benefits, and to the extent that the fund is not reimbursed for the extended benefits in accordance with section 204 of the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970, the extended benefits paid to individuals based on wages paid by the state government employing unit regardless of the source of funds from which the wages are paid.

The benefits shall be financed by appropriation of funds by the General Assembly.

The division shall bill and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall promptly reimburse the division for such benefit payments in accordance with subsection (d) of this section; and

Each private nonprofit employer and each government employing unit for which services as defined in § 11-10-210(a)(2)(B) are performed and that has elected to make payment in lieu of contributions shall, for calendar quarters beginning on and after January 1, 1979, pay such amount as the employer may estimate to be the amount of regular benefits and one-half (½) of the extended benefits, except that government employing units shall include all of the extended benefits expected to be paid to individuals based on wages paid by the employer during the period.

The payments shall be made on or before the tenth day of the first month of each calendar quarter.

The percentage used to determine the amount of quarterly payment due under this subdivision (e)(2) shall be determined by the director and shall be based on the average quarterly benefit cost of each employer during the fiscal year ending on June 30 of the immediately preceding calendar year.

If any employer subject to this subdivision (e)(2) did not have wages in an immediately preceding fiscal year, the director shall determine the average quarterly wages to be used in determining the amount of quarterly payment to be made in the current year by the employer. The determination shall be based on that portion of the fiscal year during which wages were paid.

On December 31 of each calendar year or as soon thereafter as possible, the director shall determine whether the total amount of payments made for the year by the employer is less than or in excess of the total amount of benefit payments chargeable to the employer under this section. Each employer whose total payments for the year were less than the amount so determined shall be liable for payment of the unpaid balance and shall pay the amount due within thirty (30) days after the date on which the director shall mail to the employer a notice of the amount. If the total payment exceeds the amount so determined for the calendar year, all or a part of the excess may, at the option of the employer, be refunded to the employer or retained as part payment against future payments.

If benefits paid to an individual are based on wages paid by one (1) or more employers that are liable for payments in lieu of contributions and on wages paid by one (1) or more employers who are liable for contributions or by two (2) or more employers that are liable for payments in lieu of contributions, the amount of benefits payable by each employer that is liable for payments in lieu of contributions shall be an amount which bears the same ratio to the total benefits paid to the individual as the total base-period wages paid to the individual by the employer bears to the total base-period wages paid to the individual by all of his or her base-period employers.

If any employer is delinquent in making any payments in lieu of contributions as required under this section, the director may terminate the employer's election to make payments in lieu of contributions as of the beginning of the next calendar year, and the termination shall be effective for that and the next calendar year.

Two (2) or more employers that have become liable for payments in lieu of contributions in accordance with subsection (c) of this section may file a joint application to the director for the establishment of a group account for the purpose of sharing the cost of benefits that are attributable to service in the employ of the employers.

Each application shall identify and authorize a group representative to act as the group's agent for the purposes of this subsection.

Upon his or her approval of the application, the director shall establish a group account for the employers effective as of the beginning of the calendar quarter in which he or she receives the application and shall notify the group's representative of the effective date of the account. The account shall remain in effect for not less than one (1) calendar year and thereafter until terminated at the discretion of the director or upon application by the group.

Upon establishment of the account, each member of the group shall be liable for payments in lieu of contributions with respect to each calendar quarter in the amount that bears the same ratio to the total benefits paid in that quarter that are attributable to service performed in the employ of all members of the group as the total wages paid for service in employment by the member in that quarter bears to the total wages paid during the quarter for service performed in the employ of all members of the group.

The director shall prescribe such rules as he or she deems necessary with respect to applications for establishment, maintenance, and termination of group accounts that are authorized by this subsection, for addition of new members to, and withdrawal of active members from, the accounts, and for the determination of the amounts that are payable under this subsection by members of the group and the time and manner of the payments.

(A)

An overpayment of benefits is the result of a failure by an employer or the employer's agent to respond timely or adequately to a request for information from the Division of Workforce Services; and

(B)

The employer or the employer's agent has established a pattern of failing to respond to such requests.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, § 15; 1977, No. 376, § 13; 1979, No. 492, § 10; 1979, No. 922, § 10; 1981, No. 43, § 15; 1985, No. 8, §§ 12, 13; 1985, No. 9, §§ 12, 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 17; 1991, No. 100, § 44; 2007, No. 490, § 15; 2013, No. 1128, § 3; 2015, No. 690, § 6; 2019, No. 315, §§ 831, 832; 2019, No. 910, §§
295-297.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Subdivision (d)(2) of this section was amended by Acts 1987, No. 753, § 17, which made no change in the language of the subdivision.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added “and” at the end of (e)(1)(C).

The 2015 amendment added (d)(6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c)(6)(A) and (g)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (c)(1); substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (d)(6)(A) and (e)(1)(C); and substituted “division” for “department” in (e)(1)(C).

U.S. Code.

Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 referred to in this section is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 501(a). Section 204 of the Federal-State Extended Unemployment Compensation Act of 1970 is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 3304. Section 121 of Public Law 94-566 is codified as a note under 26 U.S.C. § 3304.

11-10-714. Exception — Reimbursable payments.

Notwithstanding any provisions in § 11-10-713, any nonprofit organization, state hospital, state institution of higher education, or group of such employers that, prior to January 1, 1969, paid contributions required by § 11-10-701, and, pursuant to § 11-10-713, elected by March 5, 1971, to make payments in lieu of contributions, shall not be required to make any payment on account of any regular or extended benefits paid, on the basis of wages paid by such nonprofit organization, state hospital, state institution of higher education, or group of such employers to individuals for weeks of unemployment that begin on or after the effective date of the election until the total amount of the benefits equals the amount of the positive balance in the experience rating account of the nonprofit organization, state hospital, state institution of higher education, or group of such employers.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 7; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1971, No. 35, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1108.

11-10-715. Employers' nonliability.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no employer shall be liable for payments in lieu of contributions with respect to extended benefit payments which are wholly reimbursed to the state by the federal government.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this or any other section of this chapter, if that portion of § 115 of Pub. L. No. 94-566, 90 Stat. 2667 which requires unemployment insurance coverage of services performed by individuals employed by municipal or county governments or local public school districts is adjudged unconstitutional or invalid in its application or stayed pendente lite by a court of competent jurisdiction, then no employer contribution shall be payable by municipal or county governments or local public school districts, provided that their employees are covered by the Special Unemployment Assistance Act of 1974, Pub. L. No. 93-567, or similar federal law providing coverage for such employees.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, §§ 2, 7; 1963, No. 93, § 9; 1975, No. 609, § 7; 1977 (Ex. Sess.), No. 6, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 81-1103, 81-1108.

U.S. Code.

Section 115 of Public Law 94-566, 90 Stat. 2667 referred to in this section is codified as 26 U.S.C. §§ 3304, 3306, and 3309. The Special Unemployment Assistance Act of 1974, Public Law 93-567, is codified as a note under 26 U.S.C. § 3304.

11-10-716. Collection — Interest on past due contributions.

If contributions are not paid on the date on which they are due and payable as prescribed by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, the whole or part thereafter remaining unpaid shall bear interest at the rate of one and one-half percent (1.5%) per month from and after the due date until payment is received by the director.

In computing interest for any period less than a full month, the rate shall be five-hundredths of a percent (0.05%) for each day or fraction thereof.

The date as of which payment of contributions, if mailed, is deemed to have been received may be determined by such rules as the director may prescribe.

At the end of each month, deposits in the Unemployment Compensation Fund Clearing Account which have been established as interest and penalty payments collected pursuant to §§ 11-10-716 — 11-10-723 shall be paid over to the Treasurer of State and credited by him or her to the Division of Workforce Services Special Fund, § 19-5-984, created and established in the State Treasury.

All withdrawals shall be upon voucher warrants issued, or caused to be issued, by the director for any one (1) or more of the following purposes as authorized by legislative appropriation:

Refunds of the interest and penalties erroneously paid;

Replacements of money lost or erroneously expended, as provided by § 11-10-322; and

Such other and additional purposes necessary to the proper administration of this chapter as specifically provided in the appropriation for the Division of Workforce Services.

Funds received as a result of the application of funds withdrawn from the fund pursuant to and in accordance with the withdrawal purposes and provisions set forth in this subsection shall also be deposited into and credited to the fund.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 14; 1965, No. 33, § 2; 1977, No. 376, § 16; 1979, No. 492, § 13; 1979, No. 922, § 13; 1985, No. 8, § 26; 1985, No. 9, § 26; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1117; Acts 1991, No. 100, § 45; 1993, No. 403, § 3; 2005, No. 21, § 1; 2005, No. 902, § 11; 2019, No. 315, § 833; 2019, No. 910, §§
298-300.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” twice in (b).